Hawaii statutes.
§454M-6 Prohibited activities. (a) It
shall be a violation of this chapter for any mortgage servicer in the course of
any mortgage loan transaction, or in connection with any mortgage servicing
business, to:

(1) Misrepresent or conceal material facts, make
false promises, or pursue a course of misrepresentation through its agents or
otherwise;

(2) Engage in any transaction, practice, or course of
business that is not in good faith, does not constitute fair dealing, or that
constitutes a fraud upon any person, in connection with the servicing,
purchase, or sale of any mortgage loan;

(3) Obtain property
by fraud or misrepresentation;

(4) Misapply residential mortgage loan payments;

(5) Misapply payments
to escrow accounts;

(6) Require any
amount of funds to be remitted by means more costly to the borrower than a bank or certified check or attorney's check from an attorney's account to be paid by
the borrower;

(7) Fail to timely pay taxes or insurance premiums of
the borrower, if and as required by this chapter;

(8) Fail to follow procedures concerning escrows for
the payment of taxes and insurance as required by this chapter;

(9) Place hazard,
homeowner's, or flood insurance on the mortgaged property when the mortgage servicer knows or has reason to know that the borrower has an effective policy for such
insurance;

(10) Fail to
provide written notice to a borrower upon taking action to place hazard, homeowner's, or flood insurance
on the mortgaged property, including
a clear and conspicuous statement of the procedures by which the borrower may demonstrate that the borrower has the required insurance coverage and by which
the mortgage servicer shall
terminate the insurance coverage placed by the mortgage servicer and refund or
cancel any insurance premiums and related fees paid by or charged to the borrower;

(11) Place hazard,
homeowner's, or flood insurance on a mortgaged property, or require a borrower to obtain or maintain such insurance, in excess of the replacement cost of the
improvements;

(12) Fail to provide
to the borrower a refund of unearned premiums
paid by a borrower or charged to the borrower for hazard, homeowner's, or flood insurance placed by
a mortgagee or the mortgage servicer
if the borrower provides reasonable proof that the borrower has obtained
coverage such that the forced placement insurance
is no longer necessary and the property is insured. If the borrower provides reasonable proof that no lapse
in coverage occurred such that the
forced placement was not necessary, the mortgage servicer shall promptly refund the entire premium;

(13) Collect
private mortgage insurance beyond the date for which private mortgage insurance is required;

(14) Collect,
charge, attempt to collect or charge, or use or propose any agreement purporting to collect or charge,
any fee not in compliance with, or prohibited by, this chapter;

(15) Fail to
provide a timely and accurate statement of account, as required by this
chapter;

(16) Fail to handle
a consumer complaint or inquiry in accordance with this chapter;

(17) Provide
inaccurate information to a credit
bureau, thereby harming a borrower's creditworthiness;

(18) Fail to
report both the favorable and unfavorable payment history of the borrower to a nationally recognized
consumer credit bureau at least
annually if the mortgage servicer regularly reports information to a credit bureau;

(19) Fail to
provide or submit a timely, complete, and accurate notice, acknowledgment,
statement, information, explanation, reminder, communication, or other information
to any person as required by this chapter;

(20) Fail to comply
with loss mitigation option requirements of this chapter;

(21) Fail to offer
loan modifications in compliance with the Home Affordable Modification Program
guidelines or directives, if the mortgage servicer is participating in the Home
Affordable Modification Program;

(22) Fail to comply
with the requirements of chapter 667 and ensure that the mortgage servicer's
attorneys and agents comply with chapter 667;

(23) Refuse to
communicate with an authorized representative of the borrower who provides a written authorization
signed by the borrower; provided
that the mortgage servicer may adopt procedures reasonably related to verifying that the representative is in fact authorized to act on behalf of the borrower;

(24) Fail to
provide a timely payoff statement as required by this chapter;

(25) Fail to issue a release of mortgage in accordance
with section 506-8;

(26) Conduct any
business for which this chapter requires a license without holding a valid license as required under this chapter or assist or aid and abet any
person in the conduct of business
without a valid license as required under this chapter;

(27) Engage in the
business of mortgage servicing without complying with bonding requirements of
this chapter;

(28) Transfer or
assign its mortgage servicer license;

(29) Change its
name or office address without complying with the requirements of this chapter;

(30) Fail to
maintain adequate records of each residential mortgage loan transaction at the
office named in the mortgage servicer license; or

(31) Make any false
statement or omission of a material
fact, in connection with any information
or reports filed with a governmental agency or NMLS or in connection with any investigation conducted
by the commissioner or another
governmental agency.

(b) It
shall be a violation of this chapter for any mortgage servicer in the course of
any mortgage loan transaction to fail to comply with any:

(1) Applicable federal law or regulation related to
mortgage servicing, including but not limited to:

(A) The Real Estate Settlement Procedures
Act, including the mortgage loan servicing transfer, escrow account
administration, and borrower request for information and error resolution
requirements;

(B) The Truth in Lending Act, title 15 United
States Code sections 1601 through 1667f, as amended, and Regulation Z adopted
thereunder, title 12 C.F.R. part 1026, as amended; or

(C) Rules and regulations issued or
administered by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau, and interpretations
of the rules by the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau through interpretive
rules, bulletins, statements of policy, and statements of guidance;

(2) Agreement with a governmental entity, agency,
agent, or regulator, or state attorney general that applies to the mortgage
servicer, including:

(A) A servicer participation agreement or
other agreement to participate in the Home Affordable Modification Program or
other Making Home Affordable program;

(B) Home Affordable Modification Program
rules, including guidance provided by Making Home Affordable program handbooks,
and supplemental directives; or

(C) The National Mortgage Settlement reached
in 2012 by the federal government and forty-nine states, with the five largest
mortgage servicers in the United States, to address mortgage servicing,
foreclosure, and bankruptcy abuses;

(3) Order of a court or government regulator that
applies to the mortgage servicer;

(4) Provision of this chapter or any rule adopted
pursuant to this chapter; or

(5) Federal or state law, rule, or regulation.

(c) It shall be a violation of this chapter
for any mortgage servicer to provide any mortgage loan modifications or other
services that would require licensing pursuant to chapter 454F, unless the
mortgage servicer is licensed under chapter 454F.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of
this chapter, a mortgage servicer shall not be in violation of this chapter if
performance of a requirement under this chapter would constitute a violation of
federal law, rules, or regulations. [L 2009, c 106, pt of §1; am L 2012, c 245,
§5; am L 2015, c 62, §6; am L 2016, c 122, §24]

Case Notes

No basis for a claim under this section (pre-2012 amendment),
where, among other things, defendant's various responses to the numerous
letters from plaintiff to defendant showed no basis for a claim that defendant
engaged in any practice that "is not in good faith, does not constitute
fair dealing, or that constitutes a fraud upon any person, in connection with
the servicing purchase, or sale of any mortgage loan" under paragraph
(2). 948 F. Supp. 2d 1086 (2013).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next